Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB629.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5735.1. Labeling of food products with gluten-containing grains.(a) Legislative findings and declarations.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Celiac disease is a potentially life-threatening and life-debilitating food allergy, autoimmune disease and digestive disease triggered by eating gluten.(2) Individuals living with celiac disease, non-celiac gluten sensitivity and other related food allergies are subject to gluten-induced sicknesses, which may:(i) Involve myriad symptoms, including vomiting, 123456789101112131415161718 diarrhea, cramping, joint pain, fatigue and brain fog.(ii) Result in damage to intestinal lining, malnutrition, permanent immunological scarring, iron deficiency anemia, diarrhea, vomiting, migraines, osteoporosis, additional autoimmune diseases, heart disease, intestinal cancers and potentially life-threatening anaphylaxis.(3) The labeling of gluten-containing grains is a key component to improve the health and safety of the residents of this Commonwealth who live with celiac disease, non-celiac gluten sensitivity and other related food allergies.(b) Labeling.--In addition to any other labeling requirement under Federal or State law, the following apply to the labeling of a food product manufactured, sold or distributed in this Commonwealth:(1) If the food product contains gluten or an ingredient derived from a gluten-containing grain, the label shall:(i) Specify the content of gluten in the food product.(ii) Include a statement that food products containing gluten may cause adverse health effects in individuals with celiac disease or certain food sensitivities or intolerances.(2) The label of the food product may specify that the food product is gluten free if:(i) the food product does not contain gluten or an ingredient derived from a gluten-containing grain;(ii) the food product contains less that 20 parts per million gluten; or(iii) the ingredients of the food product have been 20250SB0629PN0621 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 processed to remove gluten.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Gluten." The proteins that:(1) naturally occur in a gluten-containing grain; and(2) cause adverse health effects in individuals with celiac disease or certain food sensitivities or intolerances."Gluten-containing grain." Any of the following grains or a crossbred hybrid of any of the following grains:(1) Wheat, including any species belonging to the genus Triticum.(2) Rye, including any species belonging to the genus Secale.(3) Barley, including any species belonging to the genus Hordeum.(4) Oat, including any species belonging to the genus Avena sativa.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0629PN0621 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819